Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-9] Statute of limitations. An
action to recognize a foreign-country judgment must be commenced within the
earlier of the time during which the foreign-country judgment is effective in
the foreign country or fifteen years from the date that the foreign-country
judgment became effective in the foreign country. [L 2009, c 34, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next